Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.310

Comprehensive plan for utilization review—Licensing standards—Regulations.

(1) The department shall establish, in compliance with federal and state law, a comprehensive plan for utilization review as necessary to safeguard against unnecessary utilization of care and services and to assure quality care and services provided to nursing facility residents.

(2) The department shall adopt licensing standards suitable for implementing the civil penalty system authorized under this chapter and chapter 74.46 RCW.

(3) No later than July 1, 1981, the department shall adopt all those regulations which meet all conditions necessary to fully implement the civil penalty system authorized by this chapter, chapter 74.42 RCW, and chapter 74.46 RCW.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 8 s 2; 1981 2nd ex.s. c 11 s 5; 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 12; 1980 c 184 s 5; 1979 ex.s. c 211 s 67; 1977 ex.s. c 244 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 sp.s. c 8: See note following RCW 18.51.050.

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.

Conflict with federal requirements—1980 c 184: See RCW 74.42.630.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 211: See RCW 74.42.920.